Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-259.03
School lands; adjacent to city of the first or second class; annexation; vote.

The city council shall, at the next regular meeting thereof after the filing of such plat, as required by section 72-259.01, and request for annexation, vote upon the question of such annexation. The vote thereon shall be spread upon the records of such city.

Laws 1953, c. 259, § 3, p. 868.